Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1034
Nail technician, defined.

Nail technician means a person licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to perform the practices of nail technology.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-361.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 296.